North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-20.2 Uniform Foreign Money — Judgments Recognition Act [Repealed]

28-20.2-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 268, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 226, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

28-20.2-02.
Applicability. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 268, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 226, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

28-20.2-03.
Recognition and enforcement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 268, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 226, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

28-20.2-04.
Grounds for nonrecognition. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 268, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 226, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

28-20.2-05.
Personal jurisdiction. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 268, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 226, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

28-20.2-06.
Stay in case of appeal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 268, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 226, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.